Indiana, session 2026, HB1026.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2025 (RETROACTIVE)] (a)
Notwithstanding any other provision, the total amount
appropriated from the financial responsibility and opportunity
growth fund in P.L.213-2025 (HEA 1001-2025) may be used by the
budget agency, subject to budget committee review, only for the
funding of the Child Care and Development Fund voucher
program and On My Way Pre-K programmatic funding. The uses
of the appropriation from the financial responsibility and
opportunity growth fund in P.L.213-2025 (HEA 1001-2025) to
augment the state correctional facilities operations appropriation
made to the department of correction, the Medicaid assistance
appropriation made to the family and social services
administration, and the family and children fund appropriation
made to the department of child services are repealed. If
previously distributed for any of the repealed purposes, the
recipient shall return the amount received to the state comptroller
for transfer as set forth in this SECTION.
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
2026 IN 1026—LS 6148/DI 120


SECTION 2. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1026—LS 6148/DI 120